Tennessee, session 114, SB2641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-1401(3), is amended by deleting
the language "established by law and for which the state treasurer has, or has been delegated,
investment authority, oversight, and responsibility:" and substituting instead "established by law,
resolution, or ordinance and for which the state treasurer or a local governmental entity has, or
has been delegated, investment authority, oversight, and responsibility:".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-1401(3), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(F) A plan, fund, or program established, maintained, or offered by a political
subdivision that does not participate in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system or
in a plan under subdivision (3)(C), that does the following:
(i) Provides retirement income or other retirement benefits to employees
or former employees; or
(ii) Results in a deferral of income by employees for a period extending to
the termination of covered employment or beyond.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-1401, is amended by adding the
following as new, appropriately designated subdivisions:
( ) "Economic analysis" means a written analysis demonstrating the factors
considered in evaluating the financial impact of a shareholder-sponsored proposal that
addresses:
(A) The subject matter of the shareholder-sponsored proposal;
SB2641
012258
- 1 -

(B) An evaluation of the issuer's stated reasons for opposition to the
shareholder-sponsored proposal;
(C) An evaluation of whether the shareholder-sponsored proposal is
consistent with the investment objectives and risk management profile of the
program in which the beneficiaries are invested;
(D) An evaluation of the financial benefits and costs of implementing the
shareholder-sponsored proposal, as written, over a time horizon that is
consistent with the investment objectives and risk management profile of the
program;
(E) The quantifiable impact of the shareholder-sponsored proposal, as
written, on the investment returns of the beneficiaries of the program; and
(F) An explanation of the modeling, procedures, and processes used to
complete the economic analysis;
( ) "Fiduciary" means:
(A) A person who, with respect to a program under Section 2(F):
(i) Exercises discretionary authority or discretionary control with
respect to management of the program or exercises authority or control
with respect to acquisition, management, or disposition of the program's
assets; or
(ii) Has discretionary authority or discretionary responsibility in the
administration of the program, including a plan administrator for the
political subdivision; or
(B) A person who, with respect to a program, renders investment advice
for a fee or other compensation, direct or indirect, with respect to moneys or
other assets of the program or has authority or responsibility to do so;
- 2 - 012258

( ) "Political subdivision" has the same meaning as defined in § 4-58-102;
( ) "Proxy advisory firm" means a person who is engaged in the business of:
(A) Providing proxy voting advice, research, analysis, ratings, or
recommendations to the state treasurer, a political subdivision, or a fiduciary; or
(B) Providing proxy voting advice, research, analysis, ratings, or
recommendations relating to an issuer of securities;
( ) "Shareholder-sponsored proposal" means a proposal submitted to an issuer
of securities by a shareholder under 17 CFR 240.14a–8;
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-1402, is amended by designating
the existing language as a new subsection (a) and adding the following new subsection (b):
(b) Consistent with the prudent investor rule pursuant to § 35-14-103, the
standard of care pursuant to § 35-14-104, and the exercise of reasonable care in
delegation of investment and management functions pursuant to § 35-14-111, a
fiduciary, as defined in § 9-4-1401( )(A), and the fiduciary's staff, shall invest, reinvest,
manage, and select investment options for assets of a program, as defined in Section
2(F), for financial reasons for the exclusive benefit of the beneficiaries of the program
while maximizing long-term shareholder value.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 9, Chapter 4, Part 14, is amended by
adding the following as new sections:
9-4-1405. Fiduciary voting responsibilities.
(a) A fiduciary shall vote all shares held directly or indirectly by, subject to, or on
behalf of a program for financial reasons for the exclusive benefit of the beneficiaries of
the program while maximizing long-term shareholder value.
(b) With respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal, there is a rebuttable
presumption that a fiduciary votes its shares for financial reasons if the fiduciary's vote
- 3 - 012258

follows the recommendation of the board of directors of the issuer of the shares, as long
as the board includes a majority of independent directors.
(c) With respect to a shareholder-sponsored proposal, a fiduciary's vote in a
manner inconsistent with the recommendation of the board of directors of the issuer of
the shares is presumed to be for financial reasons if:
(1) The fiduciary conducts and documents an economic analysis
demonstrating that the vote is for financial reasons; or
(2) On behalf of the fiduciary, a third party conducts and documents an
economic analysis demonstrating that the vote is for financial reasons, and the
fiduciary determines that the economic analysis adequately demonstrates that
the vote is for financial reasons.
(d) A fiduciary shall not vote in a manner that:
(1) Subordinates the financial interest of the program's beneficiaries to
any environmental, social, and governance interests; or
(2) Promotes any environmental, social, and governance interests,
unless, based on an economic analysis, it is determined that the vote is for
financial reasons.
(e) With respect to shareholder-sponsored proposals, a fiduciary shall annually
disclose in a report to the state treasurer, in the case of a program other than a program
as defined in Section 2(F), and to the chief legislative body of a political subdivision, in
the case of a program as defined in Section 2(F), that:
(1) Each vote that was inconsistent with the recommendation of an
issuer's board of directors composed of a majority of independent directors; and
- 4 - 012258

(2) The economic analysis conducted and documented with respect to
each vote described in subsection (c) to determine that the vote was for financial
reasons.
(f) The report required under subsection (e) must be certified by the chief
executive officer and chief financial officer, or an individual acting in a similar capacity, of
the fiduciary.
(g) At least once every three (3) years, a fiduciary shall back test its economic
analysis to ensure that the models, procedures, and processes it used to predict the
financial reasons were effective, and shall deliver a report detailing the back testing to
the state treasurer, in the case of a program other than a program as defined in Section
2(F), and to the chief legislative body of a political subdivision, in the case of a program
as defined in Section 2(F). Based on the back testing, the chief executive officer and
chief financial officer, or an individual acting in a similar capacity, of the fiduciary shall
certify that the economic analysis performed by the fiduciary and included in the report
was effective.
9-4-1406. Prohibitions against conflicts of interest; disenfranchising shareholders
and undermining independent boards of directors.
(a) The state treasurer, a political subdivision, or a fiduciary shall not enter into
an agreement with a proxy advisory firm with respect to the provision of proxy advisory
services unless the proxy advisory firm acknowledges in writing and accepts under
contract its obligations under this section.
(b) A proxy advisory firm shall not provide proxy voting advice to a program if an
actual or potential conflict of interest exists that could reasonably be expected to affect
the objectivity or reliability of the proxy voting advice. For purposes of this section, "an
- 5 - 012258

actual or potential conflict of interest" includes the following acts by a proxy advisory firm
or any of its affiliates:
(1) Receiving or seeking to receive fees for consulting services from the
issuer of the shares or any of its affiliates that are the subject of any proxy voting
advice, written report, research, analysis, rating, or recommendation furnished by
the proxy advisory firm;
(2) Receiving or seeking to receive fees for consulting services from the
sponsor of a shareholder-sponsored proposal or any of its affiliates that is the
subject of the proxy voting advice; or
(3) Is a member of an organization that actively supports a shareholder-
sponsored proposal that is, or is substantially similar to, the subject of the proxy
voting advice.
(c) A proxy advisory firm shall not provide proxy voting advice to a program if its
voting recommendation is not consistent with the recommendation of a board of
directors or a committee of the program, in either instance which is composed of a
majority of independent directors, and the recommendation is based, in whole or in part,
on a decision by the applicable company's board of directors, or committee thereof, to:
(1) Pursue the adjudication of a business dispute in federal or state court;
or
(2) Exercise its discretion in connection with executive compensation
decisions.
(d) A proxy advisory firm shall not provide proxy voting advice to a program if its
negative voting recommendation is based, in whole or in part, on the level of shareholder
support received with respect to a previous proposal submitted to a vote at the company;
- 6 - 012258

provided, that the company's previous proposal was approved by shareholders in
accordance with the law of the state of incorporation of the applicable company.
SECTION 6. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 7 - 012258